Hawaii, session 2026, HB2267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 201-113, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) There is established in the state treasury the Hawaii film and creative industries development special fund into which shall be deposited: (1)  Appropriations by the legislature; (2)  Donations and contributions made by private individuals or organizations for deposit into the fund; (3)  Grants provided by governmental agencies or any other source; (4)  Effective January 2, 2023, all revenues, fees, and charges from the processing of the motion picture, digital media, and film production income tax credit pursuant to section 235-17; and (5)  [Effective July 1, 2022, all existing and future] All revenues, fees, and income received by the department from its management of public facilities that support media and entertainment workforce and business development, [with the exception of] including the Hawaii film studio." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act, upon its approval, shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST